Missouri, session 2026, HB3240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.307, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.307, to read as follows:
67.307. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Law enforcement officer", a sheriff or peace officer of a municipality with the
duty and power of arrest for violation of the general criminal laws of the state or for violation
of ordinances of municipalities;
(2) "Municipality", any county, city, town, or village;
(3) "Municipality official", any elected or appointed official or any law enforcement
officer serving the municipality;
(4) "Sanctuary policy", any municipality's order or ordinance, enacted or followed
that:
(a) Limits or prohibits any municipality official or person employed by the
municipality from communicating or cooperating with federal agencies or officials to verify
or report the immigration status of any alien within such municipality; [or]
(b) Grants to illegal aliens the right to lawful presence or status within the
municipality in violation of federal law;
(c) Intentionally inhibits federal agencies or officials from enforcing federal
immigration laws; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3240 2
(d) Prohibits the construction or permitting of facilities to house individuals
detained by federal agencies for lack of lawful presence.
2. No municipality shall enact or adopt any sanctuary policy. Any municipality that
enacts or adopts a sanctuary policy shall be ineligible for any moneys provided through grants
administered by any state agency or department until the sanctuary policy is repealed or is no
longer in effect. Upon the complaint of any state resident regarding a specific government
entity, agency, or political subdivision of this state or prior to the provision of funds or
awarding of any grants to a government entity, agency, or political subdivision of this state,
any member of the general assembly may request that the attorney general of the state of
Missouri issue an opinion stating whether the government entity, agency, or political
subdivision has current policies in contravention of this section.
3. The governing body, sheriff, or chief of police of each municipality shall provide
each law enforcement officer with written notice of their duty to cooperate with state and
federal agencies and officials on matters pertaining to enforcement of state and federal laws
governing immigration.
4. This section shall become effective on January 1, 2009.
✔